zh-TW: 植物名稱: 蓮花掌屬; 蔥屬; 姑婆芋屬; 蘆薈; 孤挺花屬; 火鶴花; 楤木屬; 茄子; 竹子; 羅勒; 月桂葉; 秋海棠; 甜椒; 天堂鳥; 盆栽; 九重葛; 黃楊屬; 仙人掌; 孔雀竹芋; 櫻桃; 聖女小番茄; 香葉芹; 韭菜; 菊花; 香菜; 香菜籽; 棉布; 櫛瓜; 番紅花; 小黃瓜; 咖哩葉; 仙客來屬; 黃色水仙花; 大麗花屬; 雛菊; 蒲公英; 蒔蘿; 石蓮花屬; 紫錐花; 雪絨花; 尤加利葉; 茴香; 蕨類植物; 榕樹; 冷杉; 連翹; 雪花蓮; 梔子花; 天竺葵; 葡萄藤; 草; 朱槿; 忍冬; 玉簪屬; 風信子屬; 繡球花屬; 常春藤; 茉莉花; 薰衣草; 百合; 木蘭屬; 金盞花; 馬鬱蘭; 薄荷; 芒; 龜背芋; 橄欖; 蘭花; 奧勒岡; 棕櫚樹; 蒲葦草; 三色堇; 紙莎草; 西芹; 牡丹; 矮牽牛花; 蝴蝶蘭; 蔓綠絨; 松木; 聖誕紅; 海神花屬; 毛茛屬; 玫瑰; 迷迭香; 橡膠植物; 鼠尾草; 虎尾蘭; 吊蘭; 太陽花; 香豌豆; 龍蒿; 百里香; 番茄; 鬱金香; 捕蠅草; 淡紫色; 睡蓮; 垂榕; 野花; 柳樹; 西洋蓍草; 絲蘭屬; 美鐵芋; 百日草; 其他
de: Pflanzenname: Aeonium; Allium; Pfeilblätter; Aloe vera; Amaryllis; Flamingoblumen; Aralia; Aubergine; Bambus; Basilikum; Lorbeerblätter; Begonia; Paprika; Paradiesvogel; Bonsai; Bougainvillea; Buchsbaum; Kaktus; Calathea; Kirsche; Kirschtomate; Kerbel; Schnittlauch; Chrysantheme; Echter Koriander; Koriander; Baumwolle; Zucchini; Krokus; Gurke; Curryblätter; Alpenveilchen; Osterglocke; Dahlie; Gänseblümchen; Löwenzahn; Dill; Echeverien; Sonnenhut; Edelweiß; Eukalyptus; Fenchel; Farn; Feigen; Tanne; Forsythie; Schneeglöckchen; Gardenie; Geranie; Weinrebe; Gras; Hibiskus; Geißblatt; Hosta; Hyazinthe; Hortensie; Efeu; Jasmin; Lavendel; Lilie; Magnolie; Ringelblume; Marjoram; Minze; Chinaschilf; Fensterblätter; Olive; Orchidee; Oregano; Palme; Pampasgras; Stiefmütterchen; Papyrus; Petersilie; Pfingstrose; Petunie; Phalaenopsis; Philodendron; Pinie; Weihnachtsstern; Zuckerbüsche; Ranunkeln; Rose; Rosmarin; Gummibaum; Salbei; Sansevieria; Grünlilie; Sonnenblume; Süße Erbse; Tarragon; Thymian; Tomate; Tulpe; Venusfliegenfalle; Violett; Seerose; Birkenfeige; Wildblume; Weide; Schafgarbe; Yucca; Zamioculcas; Zinnien; Sonstiges
da: Plantenavn: Aeonium; Allium; Alocasia; Aloe vera; Amaryllis; Anthurium; Aralia; Aubergine; Bambus; Basilikum; Laurbærblade; Begonia; Peberfrugt; Paradisfugl; Bonsai; Bougainvillea; Buksbom; Kaktus; Calathea; Kirsebær; Cherrytomat; Kørvel; Purløg; Krysantemum; Koriander; Koriander; Bomuld; Courgette; Krokus; Agurk; Karryblade; Cyclamen; Påskelilje; Dahlia; Tusindfryd; Mælkebøtte; Dild; Echeveria; Echinacea; Edelweiss; Eucalyptus; Fennikel; Bregne; Ficus; Fyr; Forsythia; Galanthus; Gardenia; Geranium; Vindrue; Græs; Hibiscus; Kaprifolie; Hosta; Hyacint; Hortensia; Vedbend; Jasmin; Lavendel; Lilje; Magnolia; Morgenfrue; Merian; Mint; Miscanthus sinensis; Monstera; Oliven; Orkidé; Oregano; Palme; Pampas-græs; Stedmoderblomst; Papyrus; Persille; Pæon; Petunia; Phalaenopsis; Philodendron; Fyrretræ; Julestjerne; Protea; Ranunkel; Rose; Rosmarin; Gummiplante; Salvie; Sansevieria; Edderkopplante; Solsikke; Sød ært; Estragon; Timian; Tomat; Tulipan; Fluefælde; Violet; Åkande; Grædende figen; Vildblomst; Pil; Røllike; Yucca; Zamioculcas; Zinnia; Andet
tr: Bitki Adı: Aeonium; Allium; Alocasia; Aloe vera; Amaryllis; Anthurium; Aralia; Patlıcan; Bambu; Reyhan; Defne yaprakları; Begonya; Dolmalık biber; Cennet kuşu; Bonsai; Begonvil; Şimşir; Kaktüs; Calathea; Kiraz; Kiraz domates; Frenk maydanozu; Frenk soğanı; Krizantem; Kişniş; Kişniş; Pamuk; Kabak; Çiğdem; Salatalık; Köri yaprakları; Siklamen; Nergis; Dalya; Papatya; Karahindiba; Dereotu; Echeveria; Ekinezya; Edelvays; Okaliptüs; Rezene; Eğreltiotu; Ficus; Köknar; Altınçanak; Galanthus; Gardenya; Sardunya; Üzüm asması; Çimen; Ebegümeci; Hanımeli; Hosta; Sümbül; Ortanca; Sarmaşık; Yasemin; Lavanta; Zambak; Manolya; Kadife çiçeği; Mercanköşk; Nane; Miscanthus sinensis; Monstera; Zeytin; Orkide; Kekik; Palmiye; Pampas otu; Hercai menekşe; Papirüs; Maydanoz; Şakayık; Petunya; Phalaenopsis; Filodendron; Çam; Atatürk çiçeği; Protea; Düğünçiçeği; Gül; Biberiye; Kauçuk bitkisi; Adaçayı; Sansevieria; Kurdele çiçeği; Ayçiçeği; Bezelye; Tarhun; Kekik; Domates; Lale; Venüs sinekkapanı; Menekşe; Nilüfer; Ağlayan incir; Yabani çiçek; Söğüt; Civanperçemi; Yuka; Zamia çiçeği; Zinya; Diğer
lt-LT: Augalo pavadinimas: Ramdis; Česnakas; Alokazija; Alijošius; Amarilis; Anturis; Aralija; Baklažanas; Bambukas; Bazilikas; Lauro lapai; Begonija; Paprika; Strelicija; Bonsai; Bugenvilija; Buksmedis; Kaktusas; Kalatėja; Vyšnia; Vyšninis pomidoras; Daržinis builis; Laiškinis česnakas; Skaistažiedė; Blakinė kalendra; Kalendra; Medvilnė; Cukinija; Krokas; Agurkas; Kvapioji murėja; Ciklamenas; Narcizas; Jurginas; Saulutė; Kiaulpienė; Krapai; Kalvorė; Ežiuolė; Edelveisas; Eukaliptas; Pankoliai; Papartis; Fikusas; Kėnis; Forsitija; Snieguolė; Gardenija; Snaputis; Vynmedis; Žolė; Kinrožė; Sausmedis; Melsvė; Hiacintas; Hortenzija; Gebenė; Jazminas; Levanda; Lelija; Magnolija; Serentis; Mairūnas; Mėta; Kininis miskantas; Monstera; Alyvmedis; Orchidėja; Raudonėlis; Palmė; Argentininė kortaderija; Našlaitė; Papirusas; Petražolės; Bijūnas; Petunija; Falenopsis; Filodendras; Pušis; Puansetija; Protėja; Vėdrynas; Rožė; Rozmarinas; Stambialapis fikusas; Šalavijas; Sansevjera; Kuokštinis chlorofitas; Saulėgrąža; Kvapusis pelėžirnis; Vaistinis kietis; Čiobreliai; Pomidoras; Tulpė; Jautrusis musėkautas; Kvapioji našlaitė; Vandens lelija; Benjamino fikusas; Laukinė gėlė; Gluosnis; Kraujažolė; Juka; Zamiokulkas; Gvaizdūnė; Kita
ro-RO: Denumirea plantei: Aeonium; Allium; Alocasia; Aloe vera; Amaryllis; Anthurium; Aralia; Vânătă; Bamboo; Busuioc; Dafin; Begonie; Ardei gras; Pasărea paradisului; Bonsai; Bougainvillea; Cimișir; Cactus; Calathea; Cireș; Roșii cherry; Asmățui; Arpagic; Crizantemă; Frunze de coriandru; Semințe de coriandru; Bumbac; Dovlecel; Șofran; Castravete; Frunze de curry; Ciclamă; Narcisă; Dalie; Margaretă; Păpădie; Mărar; Echeveria; Echinacea; Floare de colț; Eucalipt; Fenicul; Ferigă; Ficus; Brad; Forsiția; Ghiocel; Gardenie; Mușcată; Viță de vie; Iarbă; Hibiscus; Caprifoi; Crin-de-toamnă; Zambilă; Hortensie; Iederă; Iasomie; Lavandă; Crin; Magnolie; Gălbenele; Maghiran; Mentă; Miscanthus sinensis; Monstera; Măslin; Orhidee; Oregano; Palmier; Iarbă de pampas; Panseluță; Papirus; Pătrunjel; Bujor; Petunie; Phalaenopsis; Filodendron; Pin; Steaua Crăciunului; Protea; Ranunculus; Trandafir; Rozmarin; Arborele de cauciuc; Salvie; Limba soacrei; Voalul miresei; Floarea-soarelui; Sângele voinicului; Tarhon; Cimbru; Roșie; Lalea; Dionaea muscipula; Violetă; Nufăr; Smochin plângător; Floare sălbatică; Salcie; Coada șoricelului; Yucca; Zamioculcas; Cârciumăreasă; Altele
hu: Növény neve: Aeonium; Allium; Alocasia; Aloe vera; Amarillisz; Anthurium; Aralia; Padlizsán; Bambusz; Bazsalikom; Babérlevél; Begónia; Kaliforniai paprika; Bird of paradise; Bonsai; Bougainvillea; Buxus; Kaktusz; Calathea; Cseresznye; Koktélparadicsom; Chervil; Metélőhagyma; Krizantém; Cilantro; Koriander; Gyapot; Cukkini; Krókusz; Uborka; Currylevél; Ciklámen; Daffodil; Dália; Százszorszép; Pitypang; Kapor; Echeveria; Echinacea; Gyopár; Eukaliptusz; Édeskömény; Páfrány; Fikusz; Fenyő; Forsythia; Galanthus; Gardénia; Muskátli; Szőlőtőke; Fű; Hibiszkusz; Lonc; Hosta; Jácint; Hortenzia; Borostyán; Jázmin; Levendula; Liliom; Magnólia; Körömvirág; Majoránna; Menta; Miscanthus sinensis; Monstera; Olajbogyó; Orchidea; Oregánó; Pálma; Pampafű; Árvácska; Papirusz; Petrezselyem; Babarózsa; Petúnia; Phalaenopsis; Philodendron; Fenyő; Mikulásvirág; Protea; Boglárka; Rózsa; Rozmaring; Gumifa; Zsálya; Sansevieria; Csokrosinda; Napraforgó; Szagosbükköny; Tárkony; Kakukkfű; Paradicsom; Tulipán; Vénusz légycsapója; Ibolya; Tavirózsa; Kis levelű fikusz; Vadvirág; Fűzfa; Cickafark; Jukka; Zamioculcas; Vasvirág; Egyéb
pt-PT: Nome de plantas: Aeonium; Allium; Alocasia; Aloé vera; Amaryllis; Anthurium; Arália; Beringela; Bambu; Manjericão; Folhas de louro; Begónia; Pimento; Estrelícia; Bonsai; Bougainvillea; Buxo; Cacto; Calathea; Cereja; Tomate cereja; Cerefólio; Cebolinho; Chrysanthemum; Coentros; Coentro; Algodão; Curgete; Açafrão; Pepino; Folhas da planta-do-caril; Cíclame; Narciso; Dália; Margarida; Dente-de-leão; Endro; Echeveria; Flor-de-cone; Edelvaisse; Eucalipto; Funcho; Feto; Fícus; Abeto; Forsítia; Galanthus; Gardénia; Gerânio; Videira; Erva; Hibisco; Lonícera; Hosta; Jacinto; Hortênsia; Hera; Jasmim; Lavanda; Lírio; Magnólia; Cravo-de-defunto; Manjerona; Menta; Miscanthus sinensis; Monstera; Azeitona; Orquídea; Orégão; Palmeira; Erva-das-pampas; Amor-perfeito; Papiro; Salsa; Peónia; Petúnia; Falenopse; Filodendro; Pinheiro; Poinsétia; Protea; Ranunculus; Rosa; Alecrim; Árvore-da-borracha; Salva; Espada-de-são-jorge; Clorófito; Girassol; Ervilha-de-cheiro; Estragão; Tomilho; Tomate; Túlipa; Dioneia; Violeta; Nenúfar; Figueira-benjamim; Flores silvestres; Salgueiro; Milefólio; Iúca; Zamioculcas; Zínia; Outro
hr-HR: Naziv biljke: Aeonium; Allium; Alocasia; Aloe vera; Amarilis; Anthurium; Aralia; Patlidžan; Bambus; Bosiljak; Lišće lovora; Begonija; Paprika babura; Rajska ptica; Bonsai; Bugenvilija; Šimšir; Kaktus; Kalateja; Trešnja; Cherry rajčica; Krasuljica; Vlasac; Krizantema; Svježi korijandar; Sjemenke korijandra; Pamuk; Tikvica; Šafran; Krastavac; Lišće curryja; Ciklama; Sunovrat; Dalija; Tratinčica; Maslačak; Kopar; Eševerija; Ehinaceja; Runolist; Eukaliptus; Koromač; Paprat; Fikus; Jela; Forzicija; Visibaba; Gardenija; Iglica; Vinova loza; Trava; Hibiskus; Kozja krv; Hosta; Zumbul; Hortenzija; Bršljan; Jasmin; Lavanda; Ljiljan; Magnolija; Kadifa; Mažuran; Metvica; Kineski šaš; Monstera; Maslina; Orhideja; Origano; Palma; Pampas; Maćuhica; Papirus; Peršin; Božur; Petunija; Falenopsis; Filodendron; Bor; Božićna zvijezda; Protea; Žabnjak; Ruža; Ružmarin; Gumijevac; Kadulja; Sansevierija; Zeleni ljiljan; Suncokret; Ukrasni grašak; Estragon; Timijan; Rajčica; Tulipan; Venerina muholovka; Ljubičica; Lopoč; Fikus benjamin; Divlji cvijet; Vrba; Stolisnik; Juka; Zamija; Cinija; Ostalo
nl: Plantnaam: Aeonium; Allium; Alocasia; Aloe vera; Amaryllis; Anthurium; Aralia; Aubergine; Bamboe; Basilicum; Laurierbladeren; Begonia; Paprika; Paradijsvogel; Bonsai; Bougainvillea; Buxus; Cactus; Calathea; Kers; Kerstomaat; Kervel; Bieslook; Chrysanthemum; Cilantro; Koriander; Katoen; Courgette; Krokus; Komkommer; Currybladeren; Cyclamen; Narcis; Dahlia; Madeliefje; Paardebloem; Dille; Echeveria; Echinacea; Edelweiss; Eucalyptus; Venkel; Varen; Ficus; Spar; Forsythia; Galanthus; Gardenia; Geranium; Wijnstok; Gras; Hibiscus; Kamperfoelie; Hosta; Hyacint; Hortensia; Klimop; Jasmijn; Lavendel; Lelie; Magnolia; Goudsbloem; Marjolein; Munt; Miscanthus sinensis; Monstera; Olijf; Orchidee; Oregano; Palm; Pampagras; Viooltje; Papyrus; Peterselie; Pioen; Petunia; Phalaenopsis; Philodendron; Den; Poinsettia; Protea; Ranonkel; Rozenrood; Rozemarijn; Rubberplant; Salie; Sanseveria; Spinplant; Zonnebloem; Erwt; Dragon; Tijm; Tomaat; Tulp; Venus-vliegenvanger; Violet; Waterlelie; Ficus benjamina; Wilde bloem; Wilg; Duizendblad; Yucca; Zamioculcas; Zinnia; Andere
ru: Название растения: Эониум; Лук; Алоказия; Алоэ вера; Амариллис; Антуриум; Аралия; Баклажан; Бамбук; Базилик; Лавровый лист; Бегония; Болгарский перец; Райская птица; Бонсай; Бугенвиллея; Самшит; Кактус; Калатея; Вишня; Помидоры черри; Кервель; Зеленый лук; Хризантема; Кориандр; Кориандр; Хлопок; Кабачок; Крокус; Огурец; Листья карри; Цикламен; Нарцисс; Георгин; Маргаритка; Одуванчик; Укроп; Эхеверия; Эхинацея; Эдельвейс; Эвкалипт; Фенхель; Папоротник; Фикус; Пихта; Форзиция; Галантус; Гардения; Герань; Виноград; Трава; Гибискус; Жимолость; Хоста; Гиацинт; Гортензия; Плющ; Жасмин; Лаванда; Лилия; Магнолия; Бархатцы; Майоран; Мята; Мискантус китайский; Монстера; Олива; Орхидея; Орегано; Пальма; Пампасная трава; Анютины глазки; Папирус; Петрушка; Пион; Петуния; Фаленопсис; Филодендрон; Сосна; Пуансеттия; Протея; Ранункулюс; Роза; Розмарин; Фикус каучуконосный; Шалфей; Сансевиерия; Хлорофитум хохлатый; Подсолнечник; Душистый горошек; Эстрагон; Тимьян; Томат; Тюльпан; Венерина мухоловка; Фиалка; Водяная лилия; Плакучая фига; Полевой цветок; Ива; Тысячелистник; Юкка; Замиокулькас; Цинния; Другое
bg-BG: Име на растение: Еониум; Алиум; Алоказия; Алое вера; Амарилис; Антуриум; Аралия; Патладжан; Бамбук; Босилек; Дафинови листа; Бегония; Камба; Райска птица; Бонсай; Бугенвилея; Чемшир; Кактус; Калатея; Череша; Чери домат; Див керевиз; Магданоз; Хризантема; Cilantro; Кориандър; Памук; Тиквички; Минзухар; Краставица; Листа от къри; Циклама; Нарцис; Далия; Маргаритка; Глухарче; Копър; Ехеверия; Ехинацея; Еделвайс; Евкалипт; Резене; Папрат; Фикус; Ела; Форзиция; Галантус; Гардения; Здравец; Лоза; Трева; Хибискус; Зюмбюл; Хоста; Хиацинт; Хортензия; Бръшлян; Жасмин; Лавандула; Лилия; Магнолия; Невен; Майорана; Мента; Miscanthus sinensis; Монстера; Маслини; Орхидея; Риган; Палма; Пампас трева; Теменуга; Папирус; Магданоз; Божур; Петуния; Фаленопсис; Филодендрон; Бор; Коледна звезда; Протея; Ранункулус; Роза; Розмарин; Еластичен фикус; Градински чай; Сансевиерия; Хлорофитум; Слънчоглед; Сладък грах; Естрагон; Мащерка; Домат; Лале; Венерина мухоловка; Горска теменуга; Водна лилия; Плачеща смокиня; Диви цветя; Върба; Бял равнец; Юка; Замиокулкас; Циния; Други
sk-SK: Názov rastliny: Aeonium; Cesnak; Alokázia; Aloa; Amarylka; Antúrium; Aralka; Baklažán; Bambus; Bazalka; Bobkové listy; Begonia; Paprika; Rajkovité; Bonsai; Bugénvilea; Zimostráz; Kaktus; Kalatea; Čerešňa; Cherry paradajka; Trebuľka; Pažítka; Chryzantéma; Cilantro; Koriander; Bavlna; Cuketa; Šafrán; Uhorka; Kari listy; Cyklámen; Narcis; Dahlia; Sedmokráska; Púpava; Kôpor; Eševéria; Echinacea; Plesnivec; Eukalyptus; Fenikel; Papraď; Fikus; Jedľa; Forzítia; Snežienka; Gardénia; Pakost; Hroznová réva; Tráva; Ibištek; Zemolez; Hosta; Hyacint; Hortenzia; Brečtan; Jazmín; Levanduľa; Ľalia; Magnólia; Nechtík; Majoránka; Mäta; Ozdobnica čínska; Monstera; Olivovník; Orchidea; Oregano; Palma; Pampasová tráva; Fialka; Papyrus; Petržlen; Pivonka; Petúnia; Lišajovec; Filodendron; Borovica; Prýštec najkrajší; Protea; Iskerník; Ruža; Rozmarín; Kaučukovník; Šalvia; Sansevieria; Zelenec chochlatý; Slnečnica; Sladký hrášok; Estragón; Tymián; Paradajka; Tulipán; Mucholapka; Fialka; Lekno; Fikus malolistý; Lúčny kvet; Vŕba; Rebríček obyčajný; Juka; Zamiokulkas; Cínia; Iné
pl: Nazwa zakładu: Aeonium; Allium; Alocasia; Aloes zwyczajny; Amaryllis; Anturium; Aralia; Bakłażan; Bambus; Bazylia; Liście laurowe; Begonia; Papryka; Rajski ptak; Bonsai; Bougainvillea; Bukszpan; Kaktusowate; Calathea; Wiśnia; Pomidor wiśniowy; Trybula; Szczypiorek; Chryzantemy; Kolendra; Coriander; Bawełna; Cukinia; Crocus; Ogórek; Liście murrai Koeniga/Liście curry; Cyclamen; Narcyz; Dalia; Stokrotka pospolita; Dandelion; Koper; Echeveria; Echinacea; Szarotka alpejska; Eukaliptus; Koper; Fern; Figowiec; Jodła; Forsycja; Galanthus; Gardenia; Geranium; Winorośl; Trawa; Hibiskus; Wiciokrzew; Hosta; Hyacinth; Hortensja; Bluszcz; Jaśmin; Lawenda; Lily; Magnolia; Nagietek; Majeranek; Mięta; Miscanthus sinensis; Filodendron; Oliwa; Storczykowate; Oregano; Palm; Trawa pampasowa; Fiołek ogrodowy; Papirus; Pietruszka; Piwonia; Petunia; Phalaenopsis; Philodendron; Sosna; Wilczomlecz nadobny; Protea; Jaskier; Róża; Rozmaryn; Guma; Szałwia; Sansewieria; Zielistka Sternberga; Słonecznik; Groszek pachnący; Estragon; Tymianek; Pomidor; Tulipan; Muchołówka; Fioletowy; Lilia wodna; Figa płacząca; Kwiat polny; Wierzba; Krwawnik pospolity; Juka; Zamiokulkas zamiolistny; Zinnia; Pozostałe
cs: Název rostliny: Růžicovka; Okrasný česnek; Alokázie; Aloe pravá; Amarylis; Anturie; Arálie; Lilek; Bambus; Bazalka; Bobkové listy; Begónie; Paprika; Strelicie; Bonsaj; Bougainvillea; Zimostrázové dřevo; Kaktus; Kalatea; Třešeň; Cherry rajče; Kerblík; Pažitka; Chryzantéma; Cilantro; Koriandr; Bavlna; Cuketa; Krokus; Okurka; Kari listy; Brambořík; Narcis; Jiřina; Sedmikráska; Pampeliška; Kopr; Dužnatka; Echinacea; Protěž; Eukalyptus; Fenykl; Kapradí; Fíkus; Jedle; Zlatice; Galanthus; Gardénie; Pelargonie; Vinná réva; Tráva; Ibišek; Zimolez; Hosta; Hyacint; Hortenzie; Břečťan; Jasmín; Levandule; Lilie; Magnólie; Měsíček; Majoránka; Máta; Miscanthus sinensis; Monstera; Oliva; Orchidej; Oregano; Palma; Pampová tráva; Maceška; Papyrus; Petržel; Pivoňka; Petunie; Phalaenopsis; Filodendron; Borovice; Vánoční hvězda; Protea; Pryskyřník; Růžice; Rozmarýn; Kaučuková rostlina; Šalvěj; Sansevierie; Pavoučí květina; Slunečnice; Sladký hrášek; Estragon; Tymián; Rajče; Tulipán; Mucholapka venušinská; Fialová; Leknín; Plačící fík; Divoké květiny; Vrba; Řebříček; Juka; Zamioculcas; Cínie; Jiné
en: Plant name: Aeonium; Allium; Alocasia; Aloe vera; Amaryllis; Anthurium; Aralia; Aubergine; Bamboo; Basil; Bay leaves; Begonia; Bell pepper; Bird of paradise; Bonsai; Bougainvillea; Boxwood; Cactus; Calathea; Cherry; Cherry tomato; Chervil; Chives; Chrysanthemum; Cilantro; Coriander; Cotton; Courgette; Crocus; Cucumber; Curry leaves; Cyclamen; Daffodil; Dahlia; Daisy; Dandelion; Dill; Echeveria; Echinacea; Edelweiss; Eucalyptus; Fennel; Fern; Ficus; Fir; Forsythia; Galanthus; Gardenia; Geranium; Grape vine; Grass; Hibiscus; Honeysuckle; Hosta; Hyacinth; Hydrangea; Ivy; Jasmine; Lavender; Lily; Magnolia; Marigold; Marjoram; Mint; Miscanthus sinensis; Monstera; Olive; Orchid; Oregano; Palm; Pampas grass; Pansy; Papyrus; Parsley; Peony; Petunia; Phalaenopsis; Philodendron; Pine; Poinsettia; Protea; Ranunculus; Rose; Rosemary; Rubber plant; Sage; Sansevieria; Spider plant; Sunflower; Sweet pea; Tarragon; Thyme; Tomato; Tulip; Venus flytrap; Violet; Water lily; Weeping fig; Wildflower; Willow; Yarrow; Yucca; Zamioculcas; Zinnia; Other
sv: Växtens namn: Aeonium; Allium; Alocasia; Aloe vera; Amaryllis; Anthurium; Aralia; Aubergine; Bambu; Basilika; Lagerblad; Begonia; Paprika; Paradisfågel; Bonsai; Bougainvillea; Buxbom; Kaktus; Calathea; Körsbär; Körsbärstomat; Körvel; Gräslök; Chrysanthemum; Koriander; Koriander; Bomull; Zucchini; Crocus; Gurka; Lagerblad; Cyklamen; Påsklilja; Dahlia; Prästkrage; Dandelion; Dill; Echeveria; Echinacea; Edelweiss; Eukalyptus; Fänkål; Ormbunke; Ficus; Gran; Forsythia; Galanthus; Gardenia; Geranium; Vinranka; Gräs; Hibiskus; Kaprifol; Hosta; Hyacint; Hydrangea; Murgröna; Jasmine; Lavender; Lilja; Magnolia; Marigold; Marjoram; Mynta; Miscanthus sinensis; Monstera; Oliv; Orkide; Oregano; Palm; Pampas gräs; Fikus; Papyrus; Persilja; Pion; Petunia; Phalaenopsis; Philodendron; Tall; Julstjärna; Protea; Ranunculus; Rosfärgad; Rosmarin; Gummiväxt; Salvia; Sansevieria; Spindelväxt; Solros; Luktärt; Tarragon; Timjan; Tomat; Tulpan; Venus flugfälla; Violett; Näckros; Weeping fig; Vild blomma; Pil; Rölleka; Yucca; Zamioculcas; Zinnia; Annat
es: Nombre de la planta: Aeonium; Allium; Alocasia; Aloe vera; Amaryllis; Anthurium; Aralia; Berenjena; Bambú; Albahaca; Hojas de laurel; Begonia; Pimiento; Ave del paraíso; Bonsái; Buganvilla; Boj; Cactus; Calathea; Cereza; Tomate cherry; Cebollino; Crisantemo; Crisantemo; Cilantro; Cilantro; Algodón; Calabacín; Azafrán; Pepino; Hojas de curry; Ciclamen; Narciso; Dalia; Margarita; Diente de león; Eneldo; Echeveria; Equinácea; Edelweiss; Eucalipto; Hinojo; Helecho; Ficus; Abeto; Forsythia; Galanthus; Gardenia; Geranio; Vid de uva; Hierba; Hibisco; Madreselva; Hosta; Jacinto; Hortensia; Hiedra; Jazmín; Lavanda; Lirio; Magnolia; Caléndula; Mejorana; Menta; Miscanthus sinensis; Monstera; Olivo; Orquídea; Orégano; Palma; Hierba de la Pampa; Pensamiento; Papiro; Perejil; Peonía; Petunia; Phalaenopsis; Filodendro; Pino; Flor de Pascua; Protea; Ranúnculo; Rosa; Romero; Caucho; Salvia; Sansevieria; Planta araña; Girasol; Guisante de olor; Estragón; Tomillo; Tomate; Tulipán; Venus atrapamoscas; Violeta; Nenúfar; Higuera llorona; Flor silvestre; Sauce; Milenrama; Yuca; Zamioculcas; Zinnia; Otros
it: Nome della pianta: Aeonium; Allium; Alocasia; Aloe vera; Amaryllis; Anthurium; Aralia; Melanzana; Bamboo; Basilico; Foglie di alloro; Begonia; Peperone; Uccello del paradiso; Bonsai; Bougainvillea; Bosso; Cactus; Calatea; Ciliegio; Pomodoro ciliegino; Cerfoglio; Erba cipollina; Crisantemo; Cilantro; Coriandolo; Cotone; Zucchina; Crocus; Cetriolo; Foglie di curry; Ciclamino; Narciso; Dalia; Margherita; Tarassaco; Aneto; Echeveria; Echinacea; Stella alpina; Eucalipto; Finocchio; Felce; Ficus; Abete; Forsizia; Galanthus; Gardenia; Geranio; Vite d’uva; Erba; Ibisco; Caprifoglio; Hosta; Giacinto; Ortensia; Edera; Gelsomino; Lavanda; Giglio; Magnolia; Calendula; Maggiorana; Menta; Miscanthus sinensis; Monstera; Ulivo; Orchidea; Origano; Palma; Ginerio; Viola del pensiero; Papiro; Prezzemolo; Peonia; Petunia; Phalaenopsis; Philodendron; Pino; Stella di Natale; Protea; Ranuncolo; Rosa; Rosmarino; Ficus elastica; Salvia; Sansevieria; Falangio; Girasole; Cicerchia odorosa; Dragoncello; Timo; Pomodoro; Tulipano; Venere acchiappamosche; Viola; Ninfea; Ficus benjamina; Fiore di campo; Salice; Achillea; Yucca; Zamioculcas; Zinnia; Altro
nb: Plantenavn: Aeonium; Allium; Alocasia; Aloe vera; Amaryllis; Anthurium; Aralia; Aubergine; Bambus; Basilikum; Blader; Begonia; Paprika; Paradisfugler; Bonsai; Bougainvillea; Buksbom; Kaktus; Calathea; Kirsebær; Cherrytomat; Kjørvel; Gressløk; Chrysanthemum; Cilantro; Koriander; Bomull; Squash; Krokus; Agurk; Curryblader; Cyclamen; Påskelilje; Dahlia; Tusenfryd; Løvetann; Dill; Echeveria; Echinacea; Edelweiss; Eukalyptus; Fennikel; Fern; Ficus; Gran; Forsythia; Galanthus; Gardenia; Geranium; Vinranke; Gress; Hibiskus; Honeysuckle; Hosta; Hyacint; Hydrangea; Ivy; Jasmine; Lavendel; Lily; Magnolia; Fløyelsblomst; Marjoram; Mynte; Miscanthus sinensis; Monstera; Oliven; Orkidé; Oregano; Palmetre; Pampagress; Stemorsblomst; Papyrus; Persille; Peon; Petunia; Phalaenopsis; Filodendron; Furu; Julestjerne; Protea; Ranunkel; Rose; Rosmarin; Gummiplante; Salvie; Sansevieria; Gummiplante; Solsikkeolje; Blomsterert; Tarragon; Timian; Tomat; Tulipan; Venusfluefanger; Fiolett; Vannlilje; Bjørkefiken; Villblomst; Vier; Ryllik; Yucca; Zamioculcas; Zinnia; Annen
vi: Tên thực vật: Sen đá aeonium; Hành cảnh; Môn; Nha đam; Lan huệ; Hồng môn; Thông mộc; Cà tím; Tre; Húng tây; Nguyệt quế; Thu hải đường; Ớt chuông; Thiên điểu; Bonsai; Hoa giấy; Hoàng dương; Xương rồng; Đuôi công; Anh đào; Cà chua bi; Ngò rí tây; Hành tăm; Hoa cúc; Rau mùi; Ngò rí; Vải bông; Bí ngòi xanh; Nghệ tây; Dưa chuột; Cà ri; Anh thảo; Thủy tiên vàng; Thược dược; Hoa tiểu cúc; Bồ công anh; Thì là ta; Sen đá echeveria; Hoa cúc tím; Hoa nhung tuyết; Bạch đàn; Thì là; Dương xỉ; Sanh; Linh sam; Liên kiều; Hoa tuyết điểm; Dành dành; Phong lữ; Nho; Cỏ; Dâm bụt; Kim ngân hoa; Vạn phúc; Tiên ông; Cẩm tú cầu; Thường xuân; Hoa nhài; Hoa oải hương; Hoa loa kèn; Hoa mộc lan; Cúc vạn thọ; Kinh giới; Bạc hà; Chè vè; Trầu bà lá xẻ; Ô liu; Phong lan; Kinh giới cay; Cọ; Cỏ bông lau; Hoa păng-xê; Cói; Mùi tây; Hoa mẫu đơn; Dã yên thảo; Lan hồ điệp; Ráy thơm; Thông; Trạng nguyên; Thảo đường; Mao lương; Hình hoa hồng; Hương thảo; Cây cao su; Xô thơm; Lưỡi hổ; Lan chi; Hướng dương; Đậu ngọt; Ngải giấm; Xạ hương; Cà chua; hoa tulip; Cây bẫy kẹp; Màu violet; Hoa súng; Si; Hoa dại; Liễu; Cỏ thi; Ngọc giá; Kim tiền; Cúc zinnia; Khác
ja: 植物名: アエオニウム; アリウム; アロカシア; アロエベラ; アマリリス; アンスリウム; アラリア; 茄子; バンブー; バジル; ベイリーフ; ベゴニア; ピーマン; 極楽鳥; 盆栽; ブーゲンビリア; ボックスウッド; サボテン; カラテア; チェリー; ミニトマト; チャービル; チャイブ; 菊; コリアンダー; コリアンダー; コットン; ズッキーニ; クロッカス; キュウリ; カレーリーフ; シクラメン; 水仙; ダリア; デイジー; タンポポ; ディル; エケベリア; エキナセア; エーデルワイス; ユーカリ; ウイキョウ; シダ; イチジク; モミ; レンギョウ; ガランサス; クチナシ; ゼラニウム; ブドウ; 芝生; ハイビスカス; スイカズラ; ギボウシ; ヒヤシンス; あじさい; アイビー; ジャスミン; ラベンダー; リリー; マグノリア; マリーゴールド; マージョラム; ミント; ススキ; モンステラ; オリーブ; 蘭; オレガノ; ヤシ; パンパスグラス; パンジー; パピルス; パセリ; シャクヤク; ペチュニア; 胡蝶蘭; フィロデンドロン; 松; ポインセチア; プロテア; ラナンキュラス; ローズ; ローズマリー; ゴムノキ; セージ; サンスベリア; オリヅルラン; ヒマワリ; スイートピー; タラゴン; タイム; トマト; チューリップ; ハエトリソウ; バイオレット; スイレン; ベンジャミン; ワイルドフラワー; 柳; ヤロウ; ユッカ; ザミオクルカス; ジニア; その他
ko: 식물명: 아이오니움; 알리움; 알로카시아; 알로에 베라; 아마릴리스; 안스리움; 땅두릅; 가지; 대나무; 바질; 월계수잎; 베고니아; 피망; 극락조; 분재; 부겐빌레아; 회양목; 선인장; 칼라데아; 체리; 방울토마토; 처빌; 쪽파; 국화; 고수; 코리앤더; 면; 애호박; 크로커스; 오이; 커리잎; 시클라멘; 수선화; 달리아; 데이지; 민들레; 딜; 에케베리아; 에키네시아; 에델바이스; 유칼립투스; 회향; 양치류; 무화과나무; 전나무; 개나리; 갈란투스; 치자나무; 제라늄; 포도덩굴; 풀; 히비스커스; 인동; 호스타; 히아신스; 수국; 아이비; 자스민; 라벤더; 백합; 목련; 금잔화; 마조람; 민트; 억새; 몬스테라; 올리브; 난초; 오레가노; 야자나무; 팜파스 그래스; 팬지; 파피루스; 파슬리; 작약; 피튜니아; 호접란; 필로덴드론; 소나무; 포인세티아; 프로테아; 라넌큘러스; 장미; 로즈마리; 고무나무; 세이지; 산세베리아; 자주달개비; 해바라기; 스위트피; 타라곤; 타임; 토마토; 튤립; 파리지옥; 연보라색; 수련; 벤자민고무나무; 야생화; 버드나무; 톱풀; 유카; 자미오쿨카스; 백일홍; 기타
sl-SI: Ime rastline: Eonij; Luk; Alokazija; Aloe vera; Amarilis; Flamingovec; Aralija; Jajčevec; Bambus; Bazilika; Lovorjevi listi; Begonija; Paprika; Rajska ptica; Bonsaj; Bugenvilija; Šimšir; Kaktus; Kalateja; Češnja; Češnjev paradižnik; Krebuljica; Drobnjak; Krizantema; Koriander; Koriander; Bombaž; Bučka; Žafran; Kumara; Curry listi; Ciklama; Narcisa; Dalija; Marjetica; Regrat; Koper; Eševerija; Echinacea; Edelweiss; Evkaliptus; Koromač; Praprot; Fikus; Jelka; Forzicija; Zvonček; Gardenija; Geranija; Vinska trta; Trava; Hibiskus; Kosteničevje; Hosta; Hijacinta; Hortenzija; Bršljan; Jasmin; Sivka; Lilija; Magnolija; Žametnica; Majaron; Meta; Kitajski trstikovec; Monstera; Oliva; Orhideja; Origano; Palma; Pampaška trava; Mačeha; Papirus; Peteršilj; Potonika; Petunija; Falenopsis; Filodendron; Borovec; Božična zvezda; Proteja; Zlatica; Vrtnica; Rožmarin; Gumovec; Žajbelj; Taščin jezik; Čopasta zelenčica; Sončnica; Dišeči grahor; Pehtran; Timijan; Paradižnik; Tulipan; Muholovka; Vijolica; Lokvanjevka; Benjamin; Travniške rože; Vrba; Rman; Juka; Zamifolija; Cinija; Drugo
zh-CN: 植物名称: 莲花掌属; 葱属; 海芋; 芦荟; 孤挺花; 火鹤花; 楤木属; 茄子; 竹子; 罗勒; 月桂叶; 海棠; 灯笼椒; 天堂鸟花; 盆景; 叶子花属; 黄杨木; 仙人掌; 蓝花蕉; 樱桃; 圣女果; 山萝卜; 韭菜; 菊花; 香菜叶; 香菜; 棉布; 小胡瓜; 番红花; 黄瓜; 咖喱叶; 仙客来; 水仙花; 大丽花; 雏菊; 蒲公英; 莳萝; 石莲花属; 紫锥花; 雪绒花; 桉树; 茴香; 蕨类; 榕属; 冷杉; 连翘; 雪花莲; 栀子花; 天竺葵; 葡萄藤; 草; 木槿; 金银花; 玉簪属; 风信子; 绣球花; 常春藤; 茉莉; 薰衣草; 百合; 木兰; 万寿菊; 马郁兰; 薄荷; 芒草; 龟背竹; 橄榄; 兰花; 牛至; 棕榈; 潘帕斯草; 三色堇; 纸莎草; 欧芹; 牡丹; 矮牵牛; 蝴蝶兰; 喜林芋; 松树; 一品红; 普罗蒂亚; 毛茛; 玫瑰型; 迷迭香; 橡胶树; 鼠尾草; 虎尾兰; 蜘蛛草; 向日葵; 甜豌豆; 龙蒿叶; 百里香; 番茄; 郁金香; 捕蝇草; 紫罗兰色; 荷花; 垂叶榕; 野花; 柳; 蓍草; 丝兰; 金钱树; 百日草; 其他
fi: Kasvin nimi: Aeonium; Allium; Alocasia; Aloe vera; Amaryllis; Anthurium; Aralia; Munakoiso; Bambu; Basilika; Laakerinlehdet; Begonia; Paprika; Kolibrikukka; Bonsai; Ihmeköynnös; Puksipuu; Kaktus; Maija; Kirsikka; Kirsikkatomaatti; Kirveli; Ruohosipuli; Krysanteemi; Korianteri; Korianteri; Puuvilla; Kesäkurpitsa; Krookus; Kurkku; Intianjasmikki; Syklaami; Narsissi; Daalia; Päivänkakkara; Voikukka; Tilli; Mehiruusuke; Punahatut; Alppitähti; Eukalyptus; Fenkoli; Saniainen; Fiikus; Kuusi; Onnenpensaat; Lumikellot; Gardenia; Kurjenpolvet; Viiniköynnös; Ruoho; Hibiskus; Kuusama; Kuunlilja; Hyasintti; Hortensia; Muratti; Jasmiini; Laventeli; Lilja; Magnolia; Kehäkukka; Meirami; Minttu; Miscanthus sinensis; Peikonlehti; Oliivi; Orkidea; Oregano; Palmu; Pampaheinä; Orvokki; Papyrus; Persilja; Pioni; Petunia; Perhoskämmekkä; Köynnösvehkat; Mänty; Joulutähti; Protea; Leinikit; Ruusu; Rosmariini; Kumiviikuna; Salvia; Anopinkieli; Kirjorönsylilja; Auringonkukka; Makea herne; Rakuuna; Timjami; Tomaatti; Tulppaani; Kärpäsloukku; Violetti; Vesililja; Limoviikuna; Villikukka; Paju; Siankärsämä; Jukkapalmu; Palmuvehka; Tsinnia; Muu
fr: Nom de la plante: Aeonium; Allium; Alocasia; Aloe vera; Amaryllis; Anthurium; Aralia; Aubergine; Bambou; Basilic; Feuilles de laurier; Bégonia; Poivron; Oiseau de paradis; Bonsaï; Bougainvillier; Buis; Cactus; Calathea; Cerise; Tomate cerise; Cerfeuil; Ciboulette; Chrysanthemum; Feuille de coriandre; Coriandre; Coton; Courgette; Crocus; Concombre; Feuilles de curry; Cyclamen; Daffodil; Dahlia; Marguerite; Pissenlit; Aneth; Echeveria; Échinacée; Edelweiss; Eucalyptus; Fenouil; Fougère; Ficus; Abies; Forsythie; Galanthus; Gardénia; Géranium; Vigne; Herbe; Hibiscus; Chèvrefeuille; Hosta; Jacinthe; Hortensia; Lierre; Jasmin; Lavande; Lis; Magnolia; Marigold; Marjolaine; Menthe; Miscanthus sinensis; Monstera; Olive; Orchidée; Origan; Palmier; Herbe de la pampa; Pensée; Papyrus; Persil; Pivoine; Pétunia; Phalaenopsis; Philodendron; Pin; Poinsettia; Protea; Renoncule; Pomme; Romarin; Arbre à caoutchouc; Sauge; Sansevieria; Chlorophytum comosum; Tournesol; Pois de senteur; Estragon; Thym; Tomate; Tulipe; Piège à mouches Vénus; Violette; Nénuphar; Figue pleureuse; Fleur sauvage; Saule; Achillée; Yucca; Zamioculcas; Zinnia; Autre
el: Όνομα φυτού: ΑιώνιοAeonium; Allium; Alocasia; Αλόη βέρα; Αμαρυλλίς; Ανθούριο; Αραλία; Μελιτζάνα; Μπαμπού; Βασιλικός; Φύλλα δάφνης; Μπιγκόνια; Πιπεριά; Πουλί του Παραδείσου; Μπονσάι; Μπουκαμβίλια; Πύξος; Κάκτος; Καλαθέα; Κεράσι; Ντοματίνι; Ανθρίσκος; Σχοινόπρασο; Χρυσάνθεμο; Κόλιανδρος; Κόλιανδρος; Βαμβάκι; Κολοκύθι; Κρόκος; Αγγούρι; Φύλλα κάρυ; Κυκλάμινο; Ασφόδελος; Ντάλια; Μαργαρίτα; Πικραλίδα; Άνηθος; Εχεβέρια; Εχινάκεια; Εντελβάις; Ευκάλυπτος; Μάραθο; Φτέρη; Φίκος; Έλατο; Φορσυθία; Γάλανθος; Γαρδένια; Γεράνι; Αμπέλι; Χλόη; Ιβίσκος; Αγιόκλημα; Χόστα; Υάκινθος; Υδραγεία; Κισσός; Γιασεμί; Λεβάντα; Κρίνος; Μανόλια; Κατιφές; Μαντζουράνα; Μέντα; Miscanthus sinensis; Μονστέρα; Ελαιόλαδο; Ορχιδέα; Ρίγανη; Φοίνικας; Μίσχανθος; Πανσές; Πάπυρος; Μαϊντανός; Παιονία; Πετούνια; Phalaenopsis; Φιλόδενδρο; Πεύκο; Αλεξανδρινό; Πρωτέα; Ρανούγκουλος; Τριαντάφυλλο; Δεντρολίβανο; Καουτσουκόδεντρο; Φασκόμηλο; Σανσιβέρια; Χλωρόφυτο; Ηλιέλαιο; Γλυκομπίζελο; Εστραγκόν; Θυμάρι; Tomato; Τουλίπα; Διωναία; Βιολέτα; Νούφαρο; Μπενζαμίνη; Αγριολούλουδο; Ιτιά; Αγριαψιθιά; Γιούκα; Zamioculcas; Ζίννια; Άλλο
th: ชื่อพืช: เอโอเนียม; อัลเลี่ยม; อโลคาเซีย; ว่านหางจระเข้; ว่านสี่ทิศ; หน้าวัว; เล็บครุฑ; มะเขือยาว; ไผ่; กะเพรา; ใบกระวาน; บีโกเนีย; พริกหยวก; ปักษาสวรรค์; บอนไซ; เฟื่องฟ้า; บ็อกซ์วูด; กระบองเพชร; ต้นคล้า; เชอร์รี; มะเขือเทศเชอร์รี่; เชอร์วิล; ต้นหอมฝรั่ง; เบญจมาศ; ผักชี (Cilantro); ผักชี (Coriander); สำลี; คอร์เกตต์; โครคัส; แตงกวา; ใบหอมแขก; ไซคลาเมน; แดฟโฟดิล; รักเร่; เดซี่; แดนดิไลออน; ผักชีฝรั่ง; กุหลาบหินสกุลอิชิเวเรีย; เอคิเนเชีย; เอเดลไวส์; ยูคาลิปตัส; เฟลเนล; เฟิร์น; ยางอินเดีย; เฟอร์; เหลี่ยงเคี้ยว; หยาดหิมะ; พุดซ้อน; เจอราเนียม; องุ่น; หญ้า; ชบา; สายน้ำผึ้ง; ฮอสต้า; ไฮยาซินธ์; ไฮเดรนเยีย; ไอวี่; มะลิ; ลาเวนเดอร์; ลิลลี่; แมกโนเลีย; ดาวเรือง; มาร์จอรัม; มินต์; หญ้ามิสแคนทัส; มอนสเตอร่า; มะกอก; กล้วยไม้; ออริกาโน; ปาล์ม; หญ้าแพมพัส; หน้าแมว; ปาปิรุส; พาร์สลีย์; โบตั๋น; พีทูเนีย; กล้วยไม้ฟาแลนอปซิส; ฟิโลเดนดรอน; ต้นสน; พอยน์เซตเทีย; โพรเทีย; รานังคูลัส; กุหลาบ; โรสแมรี; ต้นยางพารา; เสจ; ลิ้นมังกร; เศรษฐีเรือนใน; ทานตะวัน; สวีทพี; ทาร์รากอน; ไธม์; มะเขือเทศ; ทิวลิป; กาบหอยแครง; สีม่วงไวโอเล็ต; ดอกบัว; ไทรย้อยใบแหลม; ไวลด์ฟลาวเวอร์; ต้นหลิว; ยาร์โรว์; เข็มกุดั่น; กวักมรกต; บานชื่น; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Nome da planta: Aeonium; Allium; Alocasia; Aloe vera; Amaryllis; Anthurium; Aralia; Berinjela; Bambu; Manjericão; Folhas de louro; Begônia; Pimentão; Ave-do-paraíso; Bonsai; Buganvília; Buxo; Cacto; Calathea; Cereja; Tomate cereja; Cerefólio; Cebolinha; Crisântemo; Cilantro; Coentro; Algodão; Abobrinha; Açafrão; Pepino; Folhas de caril; Cíclame; Narciso; Dália; Margarida; Dente-de-leão; Aneto; Echeveria; Echinacea; Edelweiss; Eucalipto; Funcho; Samambaia; Figueira; Abeto; Forsítia; Galanthus; Gardênia; Gerânio; Videira; Grama; Hibisco; Madressilva; Hosta; Jacinto; Hortênsia; Hera; Jasmim; Lavanda; Lírio; Magnólia; Calêndula; Manjerona; Hortelã; Miscanthus sinensis; Monstera; Azeitona; Orquídea; Oregano; Palma; Grama dos pampas; Amor-perfeito; Papiro; Salsa; Peônia; Petúnia; Phalaenopsis; Filodendro; Pinho; Poinsétia; Protea; Ranúnculo; Rosa; Alecrim; Seringueira; Sábio; Sansevieria; Paulistinha; Girassol; Ervilha doce; Estragão; Tomilho; Tomate; Tulipa; Planta carnívora; Violeta; Nenúfar; Figueira-benjamim; Flores silvestres; Salgueiro; Mil-folhas; Mandioca; Zamioculcas; Zínia; Outro